Utah statutes.
34A-2-904.   Volunteer emergency medical services providers -- Workers' compensation premiums.

(1)  For purposes of receiving workers' compensation benefits, any person performing the services of an emergency medical services provider is considered an employee of the entity for whom it provides those services.

(2) (a)  With regard to emergency medical services providers who perform those services for minimal or no compensation on a volunteer basis, and who are primarily employed other than as emergency medical services providers, the amount of workers' compensation benefits shall be based on that primary employment.  Any excess premiums necessary for workers' compensation shall be paid by the entity that utilized that individual as an emergency medical services provider.

(b)  With regard to emergency medical services providers who perform those services for minimal or no compensation or on a volunteer basis, and who have no other employment, the amount of workers' compensation benefits shall be the minimum benefit.  Any premium necessary for workers' compensation shall be paid by the entity that utilizes that individual as an emergency medical services provider.

(3)  Workers' compensation benefits are the exclusive remedy for all injuries and occupational diseases, as provided by Title 34A, Chapters 2 and 3.  However, emergency medical services providers described in Subsection (2) are not precluded from utilizing insurance benefits provided by a primary employer, or any other insurance benefits, in addition to workers' compensation benefits.

